Hawaii statutes.
[§431N-8] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions
or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
severable. [L 1989, c 378, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next